test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_C_makizin_CANARY_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - C - makizin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mkizin+NI: mkizin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mkizin+NI: nmakzin
     2+mkizin+NI: gmakzin
     3+mkizin+NI: makzin
     X+mkizin+NI: makzin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mkizin+NI+Con: mkiznenh
     mkizin+NI+Dim: mkiznens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mkizin+NI+Pej: mkiznish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mkizin+NI+Prt: mkizniba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mkizin+NI+4: mkiznan
     mkizin+NI+Loc: mkizning
     mkizin+NI+Pl: mkiznan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: nmakzinim
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: gmakzinim
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: makzinim
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: makzinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl: nmakzinnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl: gmakzinnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl: gmakzinwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4: makzinni
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl: makzinwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mkizin+NI+Prt+4:   mkiznibniin
     mkizin+NI+Prt+Loc: mkiznibniing
     mkizin+NI+Prt+Pl:  mkiznibniin

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+4:   nmakzinnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinnaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Pl:  nmakzinnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+4:   gmakzinnaanin
     
